Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1398.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1531 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1531. Grading, Classification and Promotion of Pupils.--(a) Teachers in the public schools shall, under the direction of the proper superintendents of schools, grade and classify the pupils in their schools so that they may pursue the courses of study herein provided for, and all pupils found proficient may be promoted twice each year.(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a school district grading policy:(1) shall require a classroom teacher to assign a grade 123456789101112131415161718192021 that reflects a pupil's relative mastery of an assignment;(2) may not require a classroom teacher to assign a minimum grade for an assignment without regard to a pupil's quality of work; and(3) may allow a pupil a reasonable opportunity to repeat a class assignment or examination for which the pupil received a failing grade and to receive a revised grade on the assignment or examination.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1398PN1606 - 2 - 123456789